Missouri, session 2026, HB2872.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 161.097, 161.241, 167.268, 167.340,
167.645, and 170.014, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 161.097,
161.241, 162.192, 167.268, 167.340, 167.645, and 170.014, to
read as follows:
161.097. 1. The state board of education shall
establish standards and procedures by which it will evaluate
all teacher training institutions in this state for the
approval of teacher education programs. The state board of
education shall not require teacher training institutions to
meet national or regional accreditation as a part of its
standards and procedures in making those evaluations, but it
may accept such accreditations in lieu of such approval if
standards and procedures set thereby are at least as
stringent as those set by the board. The state board of
education's standards and procedures for evaluating teacher
training institutions shall equal or exceed those of
national or regional accrediting associations.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HCS HB 2872 2
2. There is hereby established within the department
of elementary and secondary education the "Missouri Advisory
Board for Educator Preparation", hereinafter referred to as
"MABEP". The MABEP shall advise the state board of
education and the coordinating board for higher education
regarding matters of mutual interest in the area of quality
educator preparation programs in Missouri. The advisory
board shall include at least three active elementary or
secondary classroom teachers and at least three faculty
members within approved educator preparation programs. The
classroom teacher members shall be selected to represent
various regions of the state and districts of different
sizes. The faculty representatives shall represent
institutions from various regions of the state and sizes of
programs. The advisory board shall hold regular meetings
that allow members to share needs and concerns and plan
strategies to enhance teacher preparation.
3. Upon approval by the state board of education of
the teacher education program at a particular teacher
training institution, any person who graduates from that
program, and who meets other requirements which the state
board of education shall prescribe by rule, regulation and
statute shall be granted a certificate or license to teach
in the public schools of this state. However, no such rule
or regulation shall require that the program from which the
person graduates be accredited by any national or regional
accreditation association.
4. The state board of education shall, in consultation
with MABEP, align literacy and reading instruction
coursework for teacher education programs in early
childhood, kindergarten to fifth grade elementary teacher
certification, middle school communication arts, high school

SCS HCS HB 2872 3
communication arts, and all reading and special education
certificates to include the following:
(1) Teacher candidates shall receive classroom and
clinical training in:
(a) The core components of reading, including phonemic
awareness, phonics, fluency, comprehension, morphology,
syntax, and vocabulary;
(b) Oral and written language development; and
(c) Identification of reading deficiencies, dyslexia,
and other language difficulties;
(2) Teacher candidates shall also have training on:
(a) The selection and use of high-quality reading
curricula and instructional materials that do not include
the three-cueing system as defined in section 170.014 as an
instructional strategy for decoding;
(b) The administration and interpretation of
assessments;
(c) How to translate assessment results into effective
practice in the classroom specific to the needs of students;
and
(d) Additional best practices in the field of literacy
instruction as recommended by the literacy advisory council
pursuant to section 186.080;
(3) Educator preparation programs shall not include
instruction in, or endorsement of, the three-cueing system
as defined in section 170.014 as an instructional strategy
for decoding.
5. Beginning July 1, 2027, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall annually review and
publicly report on the compliance of educator preparation
programs with subsection 4 of this section. The review
shall include an evaluation of whether instruction is

SCS HCS HB 2872 4
grounded in the components of evidence-based reading
instruction, such as phonological awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, comprehension, morphology, syntax, and
semantics. The review shall also include an evaluation of
whether prohibited practices, including three-cueing as
defined in section 170.014, are excluded from coursework.
Educator preparation programs not in compliance with
subsection 4 of this section shall not be approved to
certify new teachers.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2014, shall be invalid and void.
161.241. 1. The state board of education, in
collaboration with the coordinating board for higher
education and the commissioner's advisory council under
section 186.080, shall develop a plan to establish a
comprehensive system of services for reading instruction.
2. The state board of education shall establish and
periodically update a statewide literacy plan that supports
high quality, evidence-based reading instruction for all
students.
3. The state board of education shall create an office
of literacy. The commissioner of education shall coordinate

SCS HCS HB 2872 5
staff with roles relating to literacy and align staff work
around supporting best practices in reading instruction.
4. The state board of education shall align literacy
and reading instruction coursework for teacher education
programs as required under subsection 4 of section 161.097.
5. Subject to appropriation, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall recruit and employ
quality teacher trainers with expertise in reading
instruction and provide opportunities for evidence-based
professional development in reading instruction available
for all active teachers.
6. The department shall maintain and publish data on
reading outcomes, provided that the report shall not include
individually identifiable student data.
7. The department shall publish criteria and examples
to help districts and schools select and use evidence-based
reading curricula and instructional materials.
Additionally, the department shall publish a list of
curricula that ensure instruction is explicit, systematic,
diagnostic, and based on phonological awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, comprehension, morphology, syntax, and
semantics. This shall be a resource to districts.
8. The department shall provide online tools and
training for active teachers on evidence-based reading
instruction.
9. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund".
(2) The fund shall be administered by the department
and used to reimburse school districts and charter schools
for efforts to improve student literacy, including, but not
limited to:

SCS HCS HB 2872 6
(a) Initiatives that provide [optional] training and
materials to teachers regarding best practices in reading
pedagogies, structured literacy, and dyslexia-informed
practices;
(b) Resources for parents and guardians to assist them
in teaching their children to read;
(c) Funding for reading tutoring programs inside or
outside of regular school hours;
(d) Stipends for teachers who undergo additional
training in reading instruction, which may also count toward
professional development requirements; and
(e) Funding for summer reading programs.
(3) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated
annually by the general assembly from general revenue to
such fund, any moneys paid into the state treasury and
required by law to be credited to such fund, and any gifts,
bequests, or donations to such fund. The fund shall be kept
separate and apart from all other moneys in the state
treasury and shall be paid out by the state treasurer
pursuant to chapter 33. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the fund at the
end of the biennium shall not be transferred to the credit
of the general revenue fund. All interest and moneys earned
on the fund shall be credited to the fund.
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial
ledger" means a searchable, machine-readable, publicly
accessible database maintained by a school district or
charter school that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted
with school district or charter school funds, including, but
not limited to, the school funds established pursuant to
section 165.011;

SCS HCS HB 2872 7
(2) Is available without login credentials,
registration, or fees;
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats
including, but not limited to, comma-separated values (CSV)
format and Microsoft Excel format;
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial
accounting manual classification categories, as applicable;
and
(5) Includes the following minimum required data
fields for each financial transaction, and is searchable and
filterable by such fields, at minimum:
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, each school district and charter school shall
maintain a financial ledger on its publicly accessible
website. The homepage of each public or charter school's
website shall include a direct link to the financial ledger
of the school district or charter school that has oversight
responsibility for that public or charter school. The link
shall make the financial ledger accessible within one click,
shall be clearly labeled as a link to the school district's
or charter school's financial ledger, and shall be
functional and mobile-responsive. The department may
provide standardized language or icons that public and

SCS HCS HB 2872 8
charter schools may use for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's or charter school's financial
ledger shall be updated at least monthly. Details of each
calendar month's financial transactions shall be posted no
later than forty-five days after the close of that calendar
month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school
district or charter school shall maintain complete financial
ledger data on its publicly accessible website for no fewer
than five prior fiscal years.
5. A school district or charter school may redact
protected personal information on the financial ledger only
to the extent required by applicable law. Vendor names,
amounts, and accounting codes shall not be redacted.
Payroll data may be presented in aggregated form where
disclosure of individual information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate
section of the financial ledger, with disclosure of the
following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized
templates or platforms a school district or charter school
may use to comply with the provisions of this section. A
school district or charter school may use a third-party
template or platform that is approved by the department.

SCS HCS HB 2872 9
8. The department may provide guidance to assist
school districts and charter schools in complying with the
provisions of this section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification
category under the Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in
the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations
applicable to the compilation and presentation of financial
ledger data.
9. School districts and charter schools shall annually
certify compliance with this section to the department. The
department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures
and timelines for school districts and charter schools to
certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district
or charter school has violated a provision of this section,
the department may withhold up to one percent of the state
aid to which the school district or charter school is
entitled under chapter 160 or 163 for the current school
year until the school district or charter school proves to
the satisfaction of the department that the school district
or charter school is no longer in violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for
members of the public to file complaints with the department
if they believe a school district or charter school has
violated any provision of this section. The department may
establish a public compliance dashboard on the department's
website to enable members of the public to check whether a
particular school district or charter school is certified as
100 in compliance with the provisions of this section.

SCS HCS HB 2872 10
101 12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
102 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
103 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
104 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
105 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
106 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
107 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
108 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
109 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
110 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
111 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
112 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
113 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
167.268. 1. Each school district and charter school
shall have on file a policy for reading success plans. Each
school district and charter school shall provide all parents
and guardians of students, including parents of students who
are identified as having a reading deficiency or substantial
reading deficiency [in reading] under [subsection 1]
subsections 5 and 6 of section 167.645, with suggestions for
regular parent-guided home reading.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines to assist districts and
charter schools in formulating policies for reading success
plans. Such guidelines may include, but are not limited to,
measures of reading proficiency, strategies for addressing
reading deficiencies, timelines for measuring pupil
improvement in reading, and information on screening of
dyslexia. Such guidelines may also identify performance
levels for pupils identified as handicapped or severely
handicapped and conditions under which such pupils may be

SCS HCS HB 2872 11
exempt from the provisions of this section and section
167.645.
3. Each school district and charter school shall
provide intensive reading instruction to students as
provided in section 167.645.
167.340. 1. The provisions of sections 167.340 to
167.346 shall be known and may be cited as the "Read to be
Ready Program".
2. Beginning July 1, [2000] 2027, if a school district
provides reading improvement instruction for students in
[kindergarten] first grade through third grade who do not
meet the [district's] state's objectives for reading as
demonstrated by performance on the district's chosen
[methods of reading assessment] Missouri reading screener
established in section 167.645, such students who receive
reading improvement instruction pursuant to this subsection
may be counted for additional average daily attendance for
state school aid during their reading improvement
instruction time if such time falls outside normal school
hours.
3. Reading improvement instruction may take the form
of summer school, provided that the summer school
instruction addresses the reading deficiency, additional
hours of instruction or such other methods as the district
may select including, but not limited to, smaller class
sizes, additional resources [including computers], reading
specialists, teacher and administrator training, tutoring,
phonics instruction and use of parents and volunteers.
167.645. 1. (1) The "Missouri Reading Screener" or
"Reading Screener" is hereby established as a literacy-based
reading assessment adopted by a school district or charter
school to be administered to students as provided in this

SCS HCS HB 2872 12
section. A reading screener shall refer to any screener
that has been approved by the department of elementary and
secondary education as of the effective date of this section
and that meets the criteria provided in this section.
(2) Any reading screener approved by the department of
elementary and secondary education shall score each student
and provide a numerical value relative to the student's
grade level and in one of the following categories: "at
risk", "approaching expectations", "meets expectations", and
"exceeds expectations".
(3) Proficiency benchmarks "below basic", "basic",
"grade-level", "proficient", or "advanced" associated with
these categories shall be determined by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(4) Each school district and charter school shall
assess all students enrolled in kindergarten once at the end
of the kindergarten year and all students in grades one
through [grade] three [at the beginning and end of each
school year] for their level of reading [or reading
readiness on state-approved reading assessments.
Additionally, all school districts and charter schools shall
assess any newly enrolled student in grades one through five
for their level of reading or reading readiness on a reading
assessment from the state-approved list] as provided in this
section.
(5) Each school district and charter school shall
administer the reading screener during three annual
administration windows established by the department of
elementary and secondary education. The first such annual
administration window shall occur within the first twenty
days of the school year, with the results of such reading
assessment sent in a letter to the student's parent,

SCS HCS HB 2872 13
guardian, or other individual having control or custody of
such student within the first thirty days of the school year.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide the reading screener at no cost to
school districts and charter schools.
3. The Missouri reading screener shall:
(1) Be appropriate for students in grades one through
three;
(2) Be used to comply with the dyslexia screening
requirements established in section 167.950; and
(3) Screen for characteristics of dyslexia and reading
deficiency and assess the following skills as
developmentally appropriate:
(a) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(b) Sound-symbol recognition;
(c) Alphabet knowledge;
(d) Decoding;
(e) Rapid naming;
(f) Encoding; and
(g) Oral reading fluency.
4. Student results on the reading screener shall not
be used to make decisions concerning the accreditation
classification of a public school or school district.
5. At the beginning of the school year, each school
district and charter school shall provide a reading success
plan to any student who:
(1) Exhibits a reading deficiency or substantial
reading deficiency [in reading which creates a barrier to]
that impedes the child's progress learning to read. The
identification of such deficiency may be based upon the most
recent assessments [or teacher observation]; or

SCS HCS HB 2872 14
(2) Has been identified as being at risk of dyslexia
in [the] a statewide dyslexia screening or has a formal
diagnosis of dyslexia.
6. (1) For the purposes of this section, a reading
deficiency shall refer to a student who scores "approaching
expectations" on the Missouri reading screener, and a
substantial reading deficiency shall refer to a student who
[is one or more grade level or levels behind in reading or
reading readiness] scores below "at risk" on the Missouri
reading screener; provided that nothing in this section
shall be interpreted to prevent a school district or charter
school from offering a reading success plan to any student
based on an assessment completed [at the start and end of
the school year] during the three administration windows or
based on teacher observation.
(2) For any student entering the school district or
charter school after the start of the school year, such
student shall be:
(a) Assessed within the first twenty school days after
entering such school; and
(b) Provided a reading success plan in the event the
student has been identified as having a reading deficiency
or substantial reading deficiency based on the student's
most recent assessment [or otherwise being identified
through teacher observation. The student's reading
proficiency shall be reassessed by reading assessments on
the state-approved list]. The student shall continue to be
provided with intensive reading instruction under a reading
success plan until the reading deficiency is remedied.
[2.] 7. The district or charter school shall notify
the parent or guardian of any student in [kindergarten]
grades one through [grade] three who exhibits a reading

SCS HCS HB 2872 15
100 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading],
101 as described in [subsection 1] subsections 5 and 6 of this
102 section, at least annually in writing and within thirty days
103 after identification of a reading deficiency or a
104 modification to services provided to the student for a
105 reading deficiency, and in an appropriate, alternative
106 manner for the parent or other guardian if necessary, of the
107 following:
108 (1) That the child has been identified as having a
109 reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in
110 reading];
111 (2) A description of the services currently provided
112 to the child;
113 (3) (a) A description of the proposed supplemental
114 instructional services and supports that the school district
115 will provide to the child that are designed to remediate the
116 identified area of reading deficiency.
117 (b) For students identified as being at risk of
118 dyslexia or those that have a diagnosis of dyslexia the
119 district shall provide an explanation that the instruction
120 that will be used to teach the child reading shall be
121 explicit, systematic, and diagnostic and based on
122 phonological awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary,
123 comprehension, morphology, syntax, and semantics;
124 (4) Strategies for parents and guardians to use in
125 helping the child succeed in reading proficiency, including
126 but not limited to the promotion of parent-guided home
127 reading;
128 (5) That if the child has a substantial reading
129 deficiency that is not corrected by the end of grade three,
130 the child shall not be promoted to grade four unless the

SCS HCS HB 2872 16
131 child qualifies for a good cause exemption under subsections
132 10 and 11 of this section.
133 [3. If the] 8. A school district or charter school
134 [provides] providing a summer reading program under this
135 section[, the district or charter school] shall notify the
136 parent or guardian of each student who exhibits a reading
137 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading of
138 the opportunity to] that the student is required to attend
139 the summer reading program.
140 [4.] 9. If a child has a reading deficiency or
141 substantial reading deficiency at the end of grade two, the
142 student's parent or guardian shall meet with designated
143 school staff to discuss the student's deficiency and shall
144 sign documentation stating that the parent or guardian has
145 been informed of the following:
146 (1) If the child has a substantial reading deficiency
147 that is not corrected by the end of grade three, the child
148 shall not be promoted to grade four unless the child
149 qualifies for a good cause exemption under subsection 11 of
150 this section;
151 (2) The child will be provided with intensive
152 instructional services and support listed under subsection
153 14 of this section;
154 (3) The parent or guardian shall agree to
155 participation in parent training workshops or regular parent-
156 guided home reading activities, or both, that are aligned to
157 scientifically-based reading research; and
158 (4) A parent or guardian's refusal to meet, sign, or
159 agree as required under this subsection shall not prevent
160 the student from receiving additional interventions or from
161 being retained by the school district.

SCS HCS HB 2872 17
162 10. (1) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year and
163 continuing in all subsequent school years, if a student has
164 a substantial reading deficiency at the end of third grade,
165 the student's parent or guardian and appropriate school
166 staff shall discuss whether the student should be retained
167 in grade level, based on a consideration of all relevant
168 factors, including the reading deficiency, the student's
169 progress in other subject areas, and the student's overall
170 intellectual, physical, emotional, and social development.
171 (2) A decision to [promote or] retain a student with a
172 substantial reading deficiency at the end of grade three
173 shall be made only after direct personal consultation with
174 the student's parent or guardian and after the formulation
175 of a specific plan of action to remedy the student's reading
176 deficiency as determined by the department of elementary and
177 secondary education.
178 (3) Based on such student's performance on the reading
179 screener at the end of the third grade, the student shall be
180 retained in grade three unless:
181 (a) Such student scores "approaching expectations" or
182 higher on a retest opportunity through the Missouri reading
183 screener after successfully completing a state-approved
184 summer reading program; or
185 (b) Such student qualifies for a good cause exemption
186 under subsection 11 of this section.
187 11. A student may be promoted to grade four despite
188 scoring "at risk" on the reading screener if the student has
189 a good cause exemption. Good cause exemptions shall be
190 limited to the following:
191 (1) Students with disabilities who have an approved
192 individualized education plan developed under the federal
193 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20

SCS HCS HB 2872 18
194 U.S.C. Section 1401, et seq., as amended, that indicates
195 that participation in the statewide assessment program is
196 not appropriate, consistent with state and federal law;
197 (2) Students with disabilities who participate in the
198 statewide summative English language arts assessment and who
199 have either of the following plans reflecting that the
200 student has received intensive reading intervention for more
201 than two years but still demonstrates a substantial reading
202 deficiency:
203 (a) An approved individualized education plan
204 developed under the federal Individuals with Disabilities
205 Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, et seq., as
206 amended; or
207 (b) A 504 plan created under Section 504 of the
208 federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794,
209 as amended;
210 (3) Students identified as English language learners
211 who have had fewer than two years of instruction in an
212 English language learner program; and
213 (4) Students who have already been retained at least
214 once in any of grades kindergarten through grade three.
215 12. Requests for a good cause exemption shall be made
216 in accordance with the following requirements:
217 (1) Documentation shall be submitted from the
218 student's teacher to the school principal indicating that
219 the promotion of the student is appropriate. Such
220 documentation shall consist only of the good cause exemption
221 being requested and the existing reading improvement plan or
222 individualized education plan, as applicable; and
223 (2) The school principal shall review and discuss the
224 recommendation with the teacher and parent or guardian and
225 make the determination as to whether the student qualifies

SCS HCS HB 2872 19
226 for one of the good cause exemptions described in subsection
227 10 in this section. If the school principal determines that
228 the student is eligible for one of the good cause exemptions
229 based on the documentation provided, the school principal
230 shall make such recommendation in writing to the
231 superintendent of the school district. The superintendent
232 shall accept or reject the school principal's recommendation
233 in writing.
234 13. (1) The school district shall assist schools with
235 providing written notification to the parent of any student
236 who is retained that:
237 (a) Such student has not met the reading level
238 required for promotion;
239 (b) The reasons the student is not eligible for a good
240 cause exemption; and
241 (c) That such student will be retained in grade three.
242 (2) The notification required under subdivision (1) of
243 this subsection shall include a description of the proposed
244 interventions and supports that will be provided to the
245 child to remedy the identified area or areas of reading
246 deficiency in the following school year.
247 [5.] 14. Each school district or charter school shall
248 do all of the following:
249 (1) Provide students who are identified as having a
250 reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in
251 reading] under [subsection 1] subsections 5 and 6 of this
252 section, have been identified as being at risk of dyslexia
253 in the statewide dyslexia screening, or have a formal
254 diagnosis of dyslexia with intensive instructional services
255 and supports specified in a reading success plan, as
256 appropriate according to student need, free of charge, to
257 remediate the identified areas of reading deficiency,

SCS HCS HB 2872 20
258 including additional scientific, evidence-based reading
259 instruction and other strategies prescribed by the school
260 district or charter school which may include but are not
261 limited to the following:
262 (a) Small group or individual instruction;
263 (b) Reduced teacher-student ratios;
264 (c) More frequent progress monitoring;
265 (d) Tutoring or mentoring;
266 (e) Extended school day, week, or year; [and]
267 (f) Summer reading programs; and
268 (g) A "read at home" plan outlined in a parental
269 contract including, but not limited to, participation in
270 parent training workshops or regular parent-guided home
271 reading activities, or both, that are aligned to
272 scientifically based reading research;
273 (2) For any student with a formal diagnosis of
274 dyslexia or for a student who was found to be at risk of
275 dyslexia in the statewide dyslexia screening, the school
276 district or charter school shall provide evidence-based
277 reading instruction that addresses phonology, sound-symbol
278 association, syllable instruction, morphology, syntax, and
279 semantics provided through systematic, cumulative, explicit,
280 and diagnostic methods;
281 (3) At regular intervals, but no less than four times
282 per year in a manner that reflects progress through each
283 school term, notify the parent or guardian of academic and
284 other progress being made by the student and give the parent
285 or guardian other useful information;
286 (4) In addition to required reading enhancement and
287 acceleration strategies, provide all parents of students,
288 including parents of students who are identified as having a
289 reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in

SCS HCS HB 2872 21
290 reading] under [subsection 1] subsections 5 and 6 of this
291 section, with a plan that includes suggestions for regular
292 parent-guided home reading.
293 [6.] 15. Each school district and charter school shall
294 ensure that intensive reading instruction through a reading
295 development initiative shall be provided to each
296 [kindergarten] grade one through grade [five] three student
297 who is assessed as exhibiting a reading deficiency or
298 substantial reading deficiency [in reading]. In addition to
299 the requirements otherwise provided, such instruction shall
300 also comply with all of the following criteria:
301 (1) Be provided to all [kindergarten] grade one
302 through grade [five] three students who exhibit a reading
303 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading]
304 under this section. The assessments shall measure phonemic
305 awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension;
306 (2) Be provided during regular school hours;
307 (3) Provide a reading curriculum that meets the
308 requirements of section 170.014, and at a minimum has the
309 following specifications:
310 (a) Assists students assessed as exhibiting a reading
311 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency in reading to
312 develop the skills to read at grade level;
313 (b) Provides skill development in phonemic awareness,
314 phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension;
315 (c) Includes a scientifically based and reliable
316 assessment;
317 (d) Does not include the three-cueing system, as
318 defined in section 170.014, as a primary instructional
319 strategy;
320 (e) Provides initial and ongoing analysis of each
321 student's reading progress; and

SCS HCS HB 2872 22
322 [(e)] (f) Provides a curriculum in core academic
323 subjects to assist the student in maintaining or meeting
324 proficiency levels for the appropriate grade in all academic
325 subjects.
326 16. Each school district shall establish at each
327 school, where applicable, an intensive acceleration class
328 for any student retained in grade three under subsection 9
329 of this section who was previously retained in kindergarten,
330 grade one, or grade two. The intensive acceleration class
331 shall include criteria established in subsections 13 and 14
332 of this section and:
333 (1) Have a reduced teacher-student ratio; and
334 (2) Provide explicit, systematic, sequential, and
335 cumulative reading instruction and intervention for the
336 majority of student contact time each day.
337 [7.] 17. School districts and charter schools shall
338 report to the department the specific intensive reading
339 interventions and supports implemented by the school
340 district or charter school pursuant to this section as well
341 as the reading assessment data collected for grades
342 [kindergarten] one through [five] three. The department
343 shall annually prescribe the components of required or
344 requested reports.
345 [8.] 18. (1) Each school district and charter school
346 shall address reading proficiency as part of its
347 comprehensive school improvement plan, drawing upon
348 information about children from assessments conducted
349 pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and the prevalence
350 of deficiencies identified by classroom, elementary school,
351 and other student characteristics. As part of its
352 comprehensive school improvement plan or contract, each
353 school district or charter school shall review chronic early

SCS HCS HB 2872 23
354 elementary absenteeism for its impact on literacy
355 development. If more than fifteen percent of an attendance
356 center's students are not at grade level in reading by the
357 end of third grade, the comprehensive school improvement
358 plan or contract shall include strategies to reduce that
359 percentage, including school and community strategies to
360 raise the percentage of students who are proficient in
361 reading.
362 (2) Each school district and charter school shall
363 provide professional development services to enhance the
364 skills of elementary teachers in responding to children's
365 unique reading issues and needs and to increase the use of
366 evidence-based strategies.
367 19. Each district school board shall, by October first
368 of each year, report in writing to the department of
369 elementary and secondary education the following information
370 regarding the immediately preceding school year:
371 (1) The school board's policies and procedures
372 regarding student retention and promotion;
373 (2) By grade level, the number and percentage of all
374 students in grades kindergarten through three with reading
375 deficiencies or substantial reading deficiencies;
376 (3) By grade level, the number and percentage of all
377 students retained in grades kindergarten to three due to
378 substantial reading deficiencies; and
379 (4) The total number and percentage of students in
380 grade three who were promoted with good cause exemptions,
381 delineated by each category of good cause exemption
382 specified in subsection 10 of this section.
383 20. Each public school shall make available to the
384 public the title and author of all reading curriculum

SCS HCS HB 2872 24
385 materials adopted for each grade and the recommended reading
386 level for such materials.
170.014. 1. This section shall be known as the
"Reading Instruction Act" and is enacted to ensure that all
public schools including charter schools establish reading
programs in kindergarten through grade five based in
scientific research. "Evidence-based reading instruction"
includes practices that have been proven effective through
evaluation of the outcomes for large numbers of students and
are highly likely to be effective in improving reading if
implemented with fidelity. Such programs shall include the
essential components of phonemic awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension, and all new teachers
who teach reading in kindergarten through grade three shall
receive adequate training in these areas.
2. (1) For purposes of this subsection, "three-cueing
system" means any model of teaching students to read based
on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, which may
also be known as "MSV".
(2) A public school district or charter school shall
provide reading instruction in accordance with the following
requirements:
(a) Phonics instruction for decoding and encoding
shall be the primary instructional strategy for teaching
word reading;
(b) Instruction in word reading shall not rely
primarily on strategies based on the three-cueing system
model of reading or visual memory; and
(c) Reading instruction may include visual information
and strategies that improve background and experiential
knowledge, add context, and increase oral language and
vocabulary to support comprehension, but such visual

SCS HCS HB 2872 25
information and strategies shall not be used to teach [word
reading] decoding.
3. Every public school in the state shall offer a
reading program as described in subsection 1 of this section
for kindergarten through grade five.
✓